Utah statutes.
31A-22-603.   Persons insured under an individual accident and health policy.

A policy of individual accident and health insurance may insure only one person, except that originally or by subsequent amendment, upon the application of an adult policyholder, a policy may insure any two or more eligible members of the policyholder's family, including husband, wife, dependent children, and any other person dependent upon the policyholder.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

